Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 1. Mining Claims on Federal Public Domain Generally.

Sec. 27.10.010.
Claims to be located as prescribed by law.

A person who discovers upon the public domain in the state a lode or vein of rock in place, or a placer deposit that is open to location under the mining laws of the United States, may locate a lode mining claim or placer mining claim by posting a notice of location and by marking the boundaries as provided in AS

27.10.030

—

27.10.070

.
An attempted location of a mining claim that does not comply with AS

27.10.030

—

27.10.070

and AS

27.10.150

—

27.10.190

is void.

History.

(§ 47-3-30 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For federal laws to which claims located on the public domain are also subject, see generally 30 U.S.C.; for laws applicable to state land, see AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

Sec. 27.10.020.
Grubstake contracts to be in writing and recorded.

All contracts commonly known as “grubstaking,” except as between the parties making them, are void unless in writing, subscribed by the parties, and recorded with the recorder of the recording district in which the location is made.
The contract must contain the names of the parties and the duration of the contract.

History.

(§ 47-3-10 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 27.10.030.
Manner of designating a lode claim location.

The discoverer of a lode claim shall designate the location as follows:

by posting at the northeast corner of the claim a plain sign or notice containing

the name of the lode claim;

the name of the locator or locators;

the date of the location;

the approximate bearings of corners and angle posts of the claim and the distances between them; and

by erecting at each corner or angle of the claim substantial monuments of stone or setting posts, not less than three feet in height nor less than three inches in diameter hewn, and marked with the name of the claim, the position or number of the monument, and the direction of the boundary lines and by cutting out, blazing, or marking the boundary lines so that they can be readily traced; where it is impracticable to place a monument in its true position, a witness monument shall be erected and marked to indicate the true position of the corner or angle.

History.

(§ 47-3-31 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1965)

Sec. 27.10.040.
Manner of designating a placer claim location.

The discoverer of a placer claim shall designate the location as follows:

by posting on one of the posts or monuments marking the boundaries of the claim a plain sign or notice containing

the name or number of the claim;

the name of the locator or locators;

the date of the location;

the number in feet in length and width claimed; and

by erecting at each corner or angle of the claim substantial monuments or posts not less than three feet in height nor less than three inches in diameter, hewn and marked with the name of the claim, the position or number of the monument, and the direction of the boundary lines and by cutting out, blazing, or marking the boundary lines so that they can be readily traced.

History.

(§ 47-3-32 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 27.10.050.
Certificate of location to be recorded.

The locator of a lode claim or placer claim shall within 90 days after the date of posting the notice of location on the claim have the claim recorded by recording a certificate of location with the recorder of the recording district in which the claim is located. The certificate of location must contain

the name or number of the claim;

the number of feet in length and width of the claim;

the date of discovering and of posting the notice of location;

the name of the locator or locators;

a description of the claim with such reference to some natural object or permanent monument so that an intelligent person with a knowledge of the prominent natural objects and permanent monuments in the vicinity can identify the claim.

History.

(§ 47-3-33 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 27.10.060.
Effect of failure to record.

Failure to record the certificate of location within the required 90 days constitutes an abandonment of the claim, and the ground is open to location.

History.

(§ 47-3-33 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 27.10.070.
Changes in locations and amended notices.

Notices may be amended at any time and monuments changed to correspond with the amended location, but no change may be made that interferes with the rights of others.
Whenever monuments are changed or an error is made in the notice or in the certificate of location, an amended certificate of location shall be recorded in the same manner and with the same effect as the original certificate.

History.

(§ 47-3-34 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Collateral references. —

53 C.J.S., Mines and Minerals, § 34 et seq.

Sec. 27.10.080.
Water rights where claim includes both banks of a stream. [Repealed, § 2 ch 50 SLA 1966.
For current law, see AS 46.15.]